el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Γκολφ: Εργαλεία αποκατάστασης χλοοτάπητα; Σετ αξεσουάρ γκολφ; Αξεσουάρ τσάντας γκολφ; Τσάντες γκολφ; Δείκτες μπαλών γκολφ; Εργαλεία συλλογής μπαλών γκολφ; Μπάλες γκολφ; Μέρη & αξεσουάρ μπαστουνιών γκολφ; Σετ μπαστουνιών γκολφ; Μπαστούνια γκολφ; Σημαίες γκολφ; Γάντια γκολφ; Αποστασιόμετρα γκολφ και συσκευές GPS; Παπούτσια γκολφ; Βάσεις μπάλας γκολφ; Πετσέτες γκολφ; Βοηθήματα προπόνησης γκολφ
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Gôn: Dụng cụ sửa sân gôn; Bộ phụ kiện golf; Phụ kiện giỏ gôn; Túi gôn; Đánh dấu bóng golf; Dụng cụ nhặt bóng golf; Bóng gôn; Phụ tùng và phụ kiện gậy đánh gôn; Bộ gậy golf; Gậy đánh gôn; Cờ gôn; Găng tay chơi gôn; Ống nhòm đo khoảng cách & thiết bị GPS golf; Giày chơi gôn; Cọc đỡ bóng gôn; Khăn chơi gôn; Dụng cụ hỗ trợ luyện tập chơi gôn
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ゴルフ: ディボットツール; ゴルフ小物セット; ゴルフバッグ関連用品; ゴルフバッグ; ゴルフボールマーカー; ゴルフボールレトリバー; ゴルフボール; ゴルフクラブパーツ・関連用品; ゴルフシャフトセット; ゴルフクラブ; ゴルフフラッグ; ゴルフグローブ; ゴルフ距離計＆GPSデバイス; ゴルフシューズ; ゴルフティー; ゴルフタオル; ゴルフ練習器具
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 골프: 디봇 툴; 골프 부대용품 세트; 골프 가방 부대용품; 골프 가방; 골프공 마커; 골프공 회수기; 골프공; 골프채 부품/부대용품; 골프채 세트; 골프채; 골프 깃발; 골프 장갑; 골프 거리 측정기 및 GPS 장치; 골프화; 골프 티; 골프 타월; 골프용 훈련 장비
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Golf: Divot Tools; Golf Accessory Sets; Golf Bag Accessories; Golf Bags; Golf Ball Markers; Golf Ball Retrievers; Golf Balls; Golf Club Parts & Accessories; Golf Club Sets; Golf Clubs; Golf Flags; Golf Gloves; Golf Rangefinders & GPS Devices; Golf Shoes; Golf Tees; Golf Towels; Golf Training Aids
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Golf: Vypichovátka; Súpravy golfového príslušenstva; Príslušenstvo golfových tašiek; Golfové tašky; Markovátka; Priťahovače golfových loptičiek; Golfové loptičky; Časti a príslušenstvo golfových palíc; Sady golfových palíc; Golfové palice; Golfové vlajky; Golfové rukavice; Golfové diaľkomery a GPS zariadenie; Golfová obuv; Golfové tričká; Golfové uteráky; Golfové tréningové pomôcky
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Golf: Divotverktøy; Tilbehørssett for golf; Tilbehør for golfbager; Golfbager; Golfballmarkører; Golfballplukkere; Golfballer; Deler og tilbehør til golfkøller; Golfkøllesett; Golfkøller; Golfflagg; Golfhansker; Avstandsmålere og GPS-enheter for golf; Golfsko; Golftees; Golfhåndklær; Treningsutstyr for golf
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Golfas: Velėnos taisymo įrankiai; Golfo priedų rinkiniai; Golfo krepšių priedai; Golfo krepšiai; Golfo kamuoliukų žymekliai; Golfo kamuoliukų surinkėjai; Golfo kamuoliukai; Golfo lazdų dalys ir priedai; Golfo lazdų komplektai; Golfo lazdos; Golfo vėliavėlės; Golfo pirštinės; Golfo atstumų matuokliai ir GPS įrenginiai; Golfo bateliai; Golfo kamuoliukų stoveliai; Golfo rankšluosčiai; Golfo treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 高尔夫用品: 草皮工具; 高尔夫配件套装; 高尔夫球包配件; 高尔夫球包; 高尔夫球位标; 高尔夫捞球器; 高尔夫球; 高尔夫球杆零件/配件; 高尔夫球杆套装; 高尔夫的球杆; 高尔夫球旗; 高尔夫手套; 高尔夫测距仪与 GPS 设备; 高尔夫球鞋; 高尔夫球座; 高尔夫毛巾; 高尔夫训练辅助设备
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Golf: Vilice za popravak trave; Setovi opreme za golf; Pribor za torbu za golf; Torbe za golf; Označivači za golf loptice; Pomagala za dohvaćanje golf loptica; Golf loptice; Dijelovi i dodaci za golf palice; Setovi golf palica; Golf palice; Zastavice za golf; Rukavice za golf; Daljinomjeri i GPS uređaji za golf; Obuća za golf; Stalci za golf lopticu; Ručnici za golf; Pomagala za vježbanje golfa
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กอล์ฟ: ที่ซ่อมกรีน; ชุดอุปกรณ์กอล์ฟ; อุปกรณ์ถุงกอล์ฟ; ถุงกอล์ฟ; ที่ทำเครื่องหมายลูกกอล์ฟ; ที่เก็บลูกกอล์ฟ; ลูกกอล์ฟ; ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์ไม้กอล์ฟ; ชุดไม้กอล์ฟ; ไม้กอล์ฟ; เสาธงกอล์ฟ; ถุงมือกอล์ฟ; กล้องวัดระยะกอล์ฟและอุปกรณ์ GPS; รองเท้ากอล์ฟ; ที่ตั้งลูกกอล์ฟ; ผ้าเช็ดไม้กอล์ฟ; อุปกรณ์ฝึกซ้อมกอล์ฟ
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Golf: Çukur Düzeltme Aletleri; Golf Aksesuar Setleri; Golf Çantası Aksesuarları; Golf Çantaları; Golf Topu İşaretleyicileri; Golf topu toplayıcıları; Golf Topları; Golf Sopası Parça ve Aksesuarları; Golf Sopası Setleri; Golf Sopaları; Golf Bayrakları; Golf Eldivenleri; Golf mesafe ölçerleri ve GPS cihazları; Golf Ayakkabıları; Golf Vuruş Noktaları; Golf Havluları; Golf Antrenman Yardımcıları
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Golf: Gräslagare; Golfkit; Tillbehör till golfbagar; Golfbagar; Markeringsbrickor för golfbollar; Bollhåvar för golf; Golfbollar; Delar och tillbehör till golfklubbor; Golfklubbset; Golfklubbor; Golfflaggor; Golfhandskar; Avståndsmätare och GPS-enheter för golf; Golfskor; Golfpeggar; Golfhanddukar; Träningshjälpmedel för golf
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Golf: Herramientas para chuletas; Juegos de accesorios de golf; Accesorios para bolsas de golf; Bolsas de golf; Marcadores para bolas de golf; Recuperadores de pelotas de golf; Bolas de golf; Accesorios y piezas para palos de golf; Juegos de palos de golf; Palos de golf; Banderas de golf; Guantes de golf; Telémetros y dispositivos GPS para golf; Calzado de golf; Tees de golf; Toallas de golf; Material de aprendizaje de golf
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Golf: Pitchforks; Sets met golfaccessoires; Golftasaccessoires; Golftassen; Golfbalmarkers; Golfbalhengels; Golfballen; Onderdelen en accessoires voor golfstokken; Sets golfstokken; Golfstokken; Golfvlaggen; Golfhandschoenen; Golfrangefinders en GPS-apparaten; Golfschoenen; Golftees; Golfhanddoeken; Benodigdheden voor golftraining
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Golf: Pitchgabeln; Golf-Zubehörsets; Golftaschenzubehör; Golftaschen; Golfballmarkierungen; Golfballangeln; Golfbälle; Golfschläger-Teile & Zubehör; Golfschläger-Sets; Golfschläger; Golffahnen; Golfhandschuhe; Golf-Entfernungsmesser & GPS-Geräte; Golfschuhe; Golf-Tees; Golfhandtücher; Golf-Trainingshilfen
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Golf: Ferramentas divot; Conjuntos de acessórios para golfe; Acessórios para sacos de golfe; Sacos de golfe; Marcadores de bola de golfe; Recuperadores de bolas de golfe; Bolas de golfe; Peças e acessórios para tacos de golfe; Conjuntos de tacos de golfe; Tacos de golfe; Bandeiras de golfe; Luvas de golfe; Telêmetros e dispositivos GPS de golfe; Sapatos de golfe; Tees de golfe; Toalhas de golfe; Acessórios de treinamento de golfe
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Golf: Narzędzia do naprawy darni; Zestawy do gry w golfa; Akcesoria do toreb golfowych; Torby golfowe; Znaczniki piłek golfowych; Wyławiacze do piłek golfowych; Piłki golfowe; Części i akcesoria do kijów golfowych; Zestawy kijów golfowych; Kije golfowe; Chorągiewki golfowe; Rękawice golfowe; Dalmierze golfowe i urządzenia GPS; Buty do golfa; Kołeczki pod piłki golfowe; Ręczniki golfowe; Artykuły treningowe do golfa
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Golf: Pitchforke; Golftilbehørssæt; Golftasketilbehør; Golftasker; Golfboldmarkører; Golfboldopsamlere; Golfbolde; Golfkølledele og tilbehør; Golfkøllesæt; Golfkøller; Golfflag; Golfhandsker; Afstandsmålere og GPS-enheder til golf; Golfsko; Golftees; Golfhåndklæder; Hjælpemidler til golftræning
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Golf: Greenihaarukat; Golftarvikesetit; Golfbägin lisätarvikkeet; Golfbägit; Golfpallon merkkaajat; Golfpallopoimurit; Golfpallot; Golfmailojen osat ja tarvikkeet; Golfmailasarjat; Golfmailat; Viheriöliput; Golfhanskat; Golfin etäisyysmittarit ja GPS-laitteet; Golfkengät; Golftiit; Golfpyyhkeet; Golfin harjoitusvälineet
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Golf: Relève-pitch; Ensembles d’accessoires de golf; Accessoires pour sacs de golf; Sacs de golf; Marqueurs pour balles de golf; Ramasse-balles de golf; Balles de golf; Accessoires et pièces de clubs de golf; Sets de clubs de golf; Clubs de golf; Fanions de golf; Gants de golf; Télémètres et appareils GPS de golf; Chaussures de golf; Tees de golf; Serviettes de golf; Outils d’entraînement pour le golf
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Golf: Orodja za popravilo lukenj; Kompleti dodatkov za golf; Dodatki za torbe za golf; Torbe za golf; Označevalci žogic za golf; Prijemalke za golf žogice; Žogice za golf; Deli in dodatki za palice za golf; Kompleti palic za golf; Palice za golf; Zastavice za golf; Rokavice za golf; Merilniki razdalje in GPS naprave za golf; Čevlji za golf; Podstavki za golf žogice; Brisače za golf; Pripomočki za vadbo golfa
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Гольф: Вилки для гольфа; Наборы аксессуаров для гольфа; Аксессуары для сумок для гольфа; Сумки для гольфа; Маркеры для мячей для гольфа; Ретриверы для мячей для гольфа; Мячи для гольфа; Детали и аксессуары для клюшек для гольфа; Наборы клюшек для гольфа; Клюшки для гольфа; Флажки для гольфа; Перчатки для гольфа; Дальномеры и GPS-устройства для гольфа; Обувь для гольфа; Ти для мячей для гольфа; Полотенца для гольфа; Тренировочный инвентарь для гольфа
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Golf: Alza pitch; Set di accessori da golf; Accessori sacche da golf; Sacche da golf; Pennarelli per palline da golf; Recupera palline da golf; Palline da golf; Parti e accessori mazze golf; Set di mazze da golf; Mazze da golf; Bandierine da golf; Guanti da golf; Telemetri e dispositivi GPS da golf; Scarpe da golf; Tee da golf; Asciugamani da golf; Attrezzatura allenamento golf
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Golfe: Ferramentas para divots; Conjuntos de acessórios para golfe; Acessórios para sacos de golfe; Sacos de golfe; Marcadores de bolas de golfe; Apanha-bolas de golfe; Bolas de golfe; Acessórios e peças para tacos de golfe; Conjuntos de tacos de golfe; Tacos de golfe; Bandeiras de golfe; Luvas de golfe; Telémetros de golfe e dispositivos GPS; Calçado de golfe; Tees de golfe; Toalhas de golfe; Equipamentos de treino para golfe
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Голф: Голф инструменти за ремонт; Комплекти аксесоари за голф; Аксесоари за чанти за голф; Чанти за голф; Маркери за голф топки; Инструменти за вадене на голф топки; Топки за голф; Части и аксесоари за голф стикове; Комплекти голф стикове; Стикове за голф; Флагове за голф; Ръкавици за голф; Голф далекомери и GPS устройства; Обувки за голф; Тениски за голф; Кърпи за голф; Помощни средства за обучение по голф
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 高爾夫球: 高爾夫球叉; 高爾夫球配件組; 高爾夫球袋配件; 高爾夫球袋; 高爾夫球位置標記物; 高爾夫撿球器; 高爾夫用球; 高爾夫球桿零件/配件; 高爾夫球桿組; 高爾夫球桿; 高爾夫旗; 高爾夫球手套; 高爾夫測距儀與 GPS 裝置; 高爾夫球鞋; 高爾夫球釘; 高爾夫球巾; 高爾夫球訓練輔助器材
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Golf: Javítóeszközök; Golf-kiegészítőkészletek; Golftáska-kiegészítők; Golftáskák; Golflabdajelzők; Golflabdaszedők; Golflabdák; Golfütőalkatrészek és -kiegészítők; Golfütő készletek; Golfütők; Golfzászlók; Golfkesztyűk; Golf távolságmérők és GPS-eszközök; Golfcipők; Golfpólók; Golftörölközők; Golf edzési segédeszközök
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Golf: Instrumente divot; Seturi de accesorii pentru golf; Accesorii pentru geanta de golf; Genți de golf; Markere pentru mingi de golf; Dispozitive pentru recuperarea mingilor de golf; Mingi de golf; Piese și accesorii pentru crose de golf; Seturi de crose de golf; Crose de golf; Steaguri de golf; Mănuși de golf; Telemetre și dispozitive GPS pentru golf; Pantofi de golf; Teuri de golf; Prosoape de golf; Articole pentru antrenamente de golf
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Golf: Vypichovátka; Sady příslušenství na golf; Golfové pytle – příslušenství; Golfové pytle; Markovače míčků při golfu; Lovítka na golfové míčky; Golfové míčky; Součásti a příslušenství ke golfovým holím; Sady golfových holí; Golfové hole; Golfové praporky; Golfové rukavice; Golfové dálkoměry a GPS zařízení; Golfová obuv; Golfová týčka; Golfové ručníky; Golfové tréninkové pomůcky